Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1672
Jury trial; notice to jury commissioner; waiver.

The clerk magistrate shall provide written notice of a jury trial to the jury commissioner not less than thirty days prior to trial. The notice shall set forth the number of petit jurors to be summoned and the day and hour the petit jurors are to appear before the court. The requirements of this section may be waived upon an agreement between the jury commissioner and the clerk magistrate or judicial administrator.

Laws 2020, LB387, § 29.